District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-301.109

Penalty for false statement.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 306, Pub. L. 87-569, § 109
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 431(e), 32 DCR 4450
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-301.109.
1981 Ed., § 29-599.11.
1973 Ed., § 29-1099j.